Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-106.5 Conversion or merger of
captive insurers. (a) Subject to this section, a captive insurance
company domiciled in the State may be converted into, or merged with, a
different form of captive insurer under this article.

(b) A plan of conversion or merger shall be
submitted to and be approved by the commissioner in advance of the proposed
conversion or merger. The commissioner shall not approve the plan unless:

(1) The commissioner finds that it is fair,
equitable, and consistent with law;

(2) The plan has been approved by at least two-thirds
of the voting interest or unanimous written consent of the voting interest of
the captive insurance company;

(3) The plan provides for:

(A) The conversion of existing stockholder,
member, or subscriber interests into equal or proportionate interests in the
new converted or merged insurer, or such other method and basis for the
conversion of the stockholder, member, or subscriber interests that is fair and
equitable;

(B) The purchase or other disposition of the
shares of any nonconsenting shareholder of a stock insurer, policyholder
interest of any nonconsenting member of a mutual insurer, membership interest
of a limited liability company, or subscriber surplus account interest, if any,
of a subscriber of a reciprocal insurer, in accordance with either an agreement
with any nonconsenting stockholder, member, or subscriber or with the existing organizational
documents of the insurer relating to the buyback buyout, or the termination of
the stockholder, member, or subscriber interests, if any, or if no such
provisions exist, then in accordance with the laws of this State relating to
the rights of dissenting shareholders; and

(C) The novation, assignment, transfer,
run-off, or other disposition of in-force policies insuring any nonconsenting
shareholder, member, or subscriber;

(4) The conversion or merger will leave the resulting
converted insurer or surviving insurer of the merger with capital or surplus
funds reasonably adequate to preserve the security of its policyholders and an
ability to continue to transact business in the classes of insurance in which
it is then authorized to transact; and

(5) The commissioner finds that the conversion or
merger will promote the general good of the State.

(c) After approval of the plan of conversion
or merger by the commissioner, the converting or merging insurer shall file
with the director of commerce and consumer affairs, appropriate organizational
documents to commence the existence of the company in its converted or merged
form. Documents filed with the director of commerce and consumer affairs
pursuant to this subsection shall comply with all applicable requirements for
such documents as may be contained in this article and chapter 414, 414D, or
428, as to the extent that these laws are applicable to the conversion or
merger.

(d) Where a stock or mutual insurer converts
to a reciprocal insurer or merges with a reciprocal insurer in which the
reciprocal insurer will be the surviving company, the stock or mutual insurer
shall include in its articles of amendment the fact of the conversion to, or
merger with, a reciprocal insurer and that the resulting or surviving entity
shall be a reciprocal insurer under the continued jurisdiction of the
commissioner, the effective date of the conversion or merger, and the name of
the agent for service of process of the converted or surviving reciprocal
insurer.

(e) In the case of the merger of two
reciprocal insurers, no articles of amendment, merger, or incorporation shall
be required to be filed with the director of commerce and consumer affairs, and
the merger shall be effective upon the effective date approved by the
commissioner pursuant to the plan of merger filed with and approved by the
commissioner.

(f) Notwithstanding that the corporate
existence of a stock or mutual insurer which converts to, or merges with, a
reciprocal insurer may cease, in all cases of a conversion or merger pursuant
to this section, and unless otherwise provided in the approved plan of conversion
or merger, the converted insurer or the surviving company of the merger shall
assume and succeed to all of the obligations and liabilities of the
pre-conversion insurer or the respective merging insurers and shall be held
liable to pay and discharge all such debts and liabilities and perform such
obligations in the same manner as if they had been incurred or contracted by
the converted or surviving merged insurer.

(g) An alien or foreign insurer may be a party
to a merger under this section provided that the surviving company shall
otherwise qualify and be approved by the commissioner as a captive insurance
company under this article. For purposes of chapters 414 and 414D, an alien
stock or mutual insurer subject to this section shall be considered a foreign
corporation.

(h) This section shall not supersede section
431:19-102, and shall not apply to redomestications or conversions of captive
insurers under section 431:19-102.4. [L 2000, c 68, §2; am L 2001, c 55, §21;
am L 2002, c 40, §73; am L 2003, c 212, §115; am L 2007, c 232, §8; am L 2012,
c 253, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next